Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2453.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of fireworks, sparklers and grills during the exclusion period to an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. For the purposes of this clause:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (i) The department shall publish a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the exclusion under this paragraph.(ii) The following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:(A) "Firework" shall mean any combustible or explosive composition or any substance or combination of substances which is intended to produce visible or audible effects by combustion, is suitable for use by the public, complies with the construction, performance, composition and labeling requirements promulgated by the Consumer Products Safety Commission in 16 CFR (relating to commercial practices) or any successor regulation adopted by the department and complies with the provisions for "consumer fireworks" as currently defined in American Pyrotechnics Association Standard 87-1 or a successor provision as adopted by the department, the sale, possession and use of which shall be permitted throughout this Commonwealth.(B) "Sparkler" shall include devices such as "ground and hand-held sparkling devices," "novelties" or "toy caps" in American Pyrotechnics Association Standard 87-1 or a successor provision as adopted by the department.(C) "Grill" shall mean any grill that uses natural gas, propane, charcoal or wood pellets as a primary source of heat.(D) "Exclusion period" shall mean the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause.(E) "Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2453PN3268 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930